Montana, session 2025, SB52.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Chancery court -- creation. Under the provisions of Article VII, section
1, of the Montana constitution, there is created the Montana court of chancery.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Jurisdiction. (1) The chancery court has the following power:
(a) to hear and resolve suits for equitable or declaratory relief based on the alleged
unconstitutionality or other illegality of a legislative enactment or a proposed or adopted legislative referendum
or a proposed or adopted citizen initiative;
(b) to hear and resolve suits for equitable or declaratory relief pertaining to the use of land and for
the grant or denial of permits pertaining to the use of land other than suits challenging or based on local zoning
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 52

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 52.1
regulations; and
(c) to hear and resolve suits for equitable or declaratory relief as well as for claims for money
damages or for restitution at law when the amount in controversy exceeds $80,000, exclusive of claims for
punitive or exemplary damages, prejudgment or postjudgment interest, costs, and attorney fees for cases
arising out of the following:
(i) an alleged breach of contract other than a claim arising principally from alleged discriminatory
practices, but including an agreement creating, amending, restructuring, or terminating a partnership,
corporation, joint venture, or other business enterprise;
(ii) the restructuring, merger, consolidation, dissolution, or sale of substantially all of the assets of
a partnership, corporation, joint venture, or other business enterprise;
(iii) the sale, underwriting, or other transfer of securities;
(iv) a trade secret;
(v) a transaction governed by the Uniform Commercial Code;
(vi) a shareholder derivative action;
(vii) a commercial class action;
(viii) a business transaction with one or more commercial banks or other financial institutions;
(ix) a dispute concerning the internal affairs of business organizations;
(x) a dispute concerning commercial or environmental insurance coverage;
(xi) a transaction involving a business trust; and
(xii) an application to stay or compel arbitration or to affirm or disaffirm an arbitration award
involving any of the cases described in subsections (1)(c)(i) through (1)(c)(xi).
(2) This section may not be construed to extend chancery court jurisdiction to criminal
prosecutions or to provide an independent ground for an award of punitive or exemplary damages, prejudgment
or postjudgment interest, costs, or attorney fees not otherwise provided by applicable law or contract.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Removal of action to chancery court. An action brought in district court
over which the district court and the chancery court have concurrent jurisdiction must, on motion of any party
made before the filing of that party's initial pleading, be transferred to the chancery court.
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 52

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 52.1

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Arbitration and mediation. A chancery court judge may submit to
arbitration a matter pending in chancery court, either on agreement of the parties or on application of either
party showing an arbitration agreement and the refusal of the opposing party to arbitrate, providing that all
parties agree to the arbitration of any question of constitutional law. A chancery court judge may order
mediation in any matter pending in chancery court.

NEW SECTION. Section 5. Chancery court proceedings. (1) At the earliest practicable date, the
chancery court shall promulgate its own rules and procedures, subject to the approval or disapproval of the
Montana supreme court.
(2) The chancery court shall adopt rules and procedures that further the just and timely resolution
of the constitutional, land use, business, and ballot issue cases entrusted to the court. To these ends, the court
shall utilize, as appropriate, alternative dispute resolution, electronic filing, and streamlined motion and
discovery practice.
(3) (a) Except as provided in subsection (3)(b), the chancery court shall resolve each case within
150 days of the filing date of the case.
(b) On motion of a party or by the court of its own accord, the chancery court may place a case on
an extended calendar when the complexity and magnitude of the factual and legal issues justifies a longer time
period for resolution.

NEW SECTION. Section 6. Supervision and administration. (1) The Montana supreme court shall
supervise the activities of the chancery court judges and associated personnel, but the governor shall pay the
expenses of the chancery court judges and the salaries and expenses of the judges' staff from appropriations
made for that purpose.
(2) As used in this section, the term "salaries and expenses" includes but is not limited to the
salaries and expenses of personnel, the cost of office equipment, court room space, and office space, and
other necessary expenses that may be incurred in the administration of [sections 1 through 11].

- 3 - Authorized Print Version – SB 52

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 52.1
NEW SECTION. Section 7. Number of chancery court judges -- selection -- term of office --
qualifications. (1) (a) The chancery court consists of three judges nominated by the governor and confirmed
by the senate. An appointment made while the senate is not in session is effective until the end of the next
regular legislative session. If an appointment subject to senate confirmation is not confirmed, the office is
vacant and another appointment must be made.
(b) The initial three judges must be selected within 90 days of [the effective date of this act], and a
replacement judge must be selected within 90 days of a vacancy.
(c) Each judge is appointed for a term of 6 years[, except as provided in [section 11]].
(d) The judges shall serve staggered terms.
(2) A chancery court judge must have the qualifications for supreme court judges specified by
Article VII, section 9, of the Montana constitution.
(3) The judges of the chancery court shall designate one of their number to serve as chief judge. In
the event a majority of the judges certify to the governor that they cannot agree on a chief judge, the governor
shall designate one judge as the chief judge.

NEW SECTION. Section 8. Hearings -- location -- staff. (1) (a) Matters before the chancery court
must be heard initially by one judge without a jury, except that a judge:
(i) may empanel an advisory jury to assist with fact-finding; and
(ii) shall empanel a trial jury if demanded by a party entitled to a jury trial under the Montana
constitution.
(b) Any party dissatisfied with a final or interlocutory determination by the trial judge may appeal to
the chancery court in full.
(c) Any party dissatisfied with a final determination by the chancery court en banc may appeal to
the Montana supreme court.
(2) The chancery court must have its central offices in Helena, and one judge shall hold trials in
Billings, one judge shall hold trials in Great Falls, and one judge shall hold trials in Missoula. The initial trial
location must be determined by the party initiating the action or by a successful motion for removal to the
chancery court, but the trial location is subject to changes of venue as the needs of justice may require. On
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – SB 52

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 52.1
request of the parties, the court may permit proceedings to be held remotely.
(3) The court may hire a clerk of court, law clerks, and administrative staff as needed.

NEW SECTION. Section 9. Applications -- investigation -- public comment. (1) An eligible
attorney may apply for the position of chancery court judge by completing and submitting to the governor an
original signed paper application and an electronic copy of the original application by the deadline date
designated by the governor. The application must state specifically that the applicant has expertise in
constitutional law, land use law, or business law, and detail at length the reasons for the claimed expertise.
(2) The governor shall advertise and solicit applications as soon as is practicable after [the
effective date of this act].
(3) The application period must close within 30 days of [the effective date of this act].
(4) Within the remaining 60 days, as provided in [section 7], the governor may authorize
investigations concerning the qualifications of applicants.
(5) Following the application deadline, the governor shall establish a reasonable period for
reviewing applications and interviewing applicants that provides at least 30 days for public comment concerning
applicants.

NEW SECTION. Section 10. Compensation -- expenses. Chancery court judges must be paid a
salary that is 20% greater than the current salary for an associate justice of the Montana supreme court as
provided in 2-16-403. The salary of a judge of the chancery court may not be reduced.

NEW SECTION. Section 11. Initial appointments. (1) The initial three judges of the chancery court
shall serve terms of office as follows:
(a) one judge shall serve a term that ends on January 1, 2031, and until the judge's successor is
appointed;
(b) one judge shall serve a term that ends on January 1, 2029, and until the judge's successor is
appointed; and
(c) one judge shall serve a term that ends on January 1, 2027, and until the judge's successor is
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – SB 52

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 52.1
appointed.
(2) The governor nominating each judge shall designate which of the three is to serve each of
these three terms.
(3) After the expiration of a term provided for in subsection (1), the governor shall appoint a person
to serve a full 6-year term as provided in [section 7]. A member who previously served an abbreviated term may
be reappointed for a full 6-year term.

NEW SECTION. Section 12. Codification instruction. [Sections 1 through 11] are intended to be
codified as an integral part of Title 3, and the provisions of Title 3 apply to [sections 1 through 11].

NEW SECTION. Section 13. Severability. If a part of [this act] is invalid, all valid parts that are
severable from the invalid part remain in effect. If a part of [this act] is invalid in one or more of its applications,
the part remains in effect in all valid applications that are severable from the invalid applications.

NEW SECTION. Section 14. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.

NEW SECTION. Section 15. Termination. [Section 11] and the bracketed language in [section
7(1)(c)] terminate June 30, 2031.
- END -
- 6 - Authorized Print Version – SB 52